test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-almatj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - almatj: # N_ODD (no grade alternations)
    almatj+N+Sg+Nom: almatj
    almatj+N+Sg+Gen: almatja
    almatj+N+Sg+Acc: almatjav
    almatj+N+Sg+Ill: almatjij
    almatj+N+Sg+Ine: almatjin
    almatj+N+Sg+Ela: [almatjist, almatjis]
    almatj+N+Sg+Com: almatjijn
    almatj+N+Pl+Nom: almatja
    almatj+N+Pl+Gen: almatjij
    almatj+N+Pl+Acc: almatjijd
    almatj+N+Pl+Ill: almatjijda
    almatj+N+Pl+Ine: almatjijn
    almatj+N+Pl+Ela: [almatjijst, almatjijs]
    almatj+N+Pl+Com: [almatjij, almatjijgum]
    almatj+N+Ess: almatjin
    almatj+N+Abe: almatjahtá
